Illinois, session 104th, HB303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-7-1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-7-1)7    Sec. 3-7-1. Administrative Regulations. The The Department 8shall promulgate Rules and Regulations in conformity with this 9Code.10(Source: P.A. 77-2097.)